Arkansas, session 2025, HB1985.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. DO NOT CODIFY. Title.
This act shall be known and may be cited as the "Arkansas Renter Refund
Act".

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code Title 26, Chapter 51, Subchapter 5, is
amended to add an additional section to read as follows:
26-51-518. Homestead credit for renters.
(a) There is allowed an income tax credit against the income tax
imposed by this chapter in the amount of five hundred dollars ($500) for a
taxpayer who:
(1) Rents his or her primary residence as a residential tenant
for the entire tax year;
(2) Has a net income of less than forty thousand dollars
($40,000) for the tax year; and
(3) Is not claimed as a dependent on another taxpayer's income
*JLL390*
04/03/2025 8:23:07 AM JLL390

HB1985
tax return.
(b) The amount of the income tax credit under this section that may be
claimed by the taxpayer in a tax year shall not exceed the amount of income
tax due by the taxpayer.

SECTION 3. EFFECTIVE DATE. Section 2 of this act is effective for tax
years beginning on or after January 1, 2025.





























04/03/2025 8:23:07 AM JLL390